lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX A   ci          hla        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hlo        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hli        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hly        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          ha         oc[it]
SFX A   ci          houc       oc[it]
SFX A   ci          houce      oc[it]
SFX A   ovat        uji        ovat
SFX A   ovat        uje¹       ovat
SFX A   ovat        uje        ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujeme      ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujete      ovat
SFX A   ovat        ují        ovat
SFX A   ovat        uj         ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujte       ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujme       ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujíc       ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujíce      ovat
SFX A   at          u          [^o]vat
SFX A   at          e¹         [^o]vat
SFX A   at          e          [^o]vat
SFX A   at          eme        [^o]vat
SFX A   at          ete        [^o]vat
SFX A   at          ou         [^o]vat
SFX A   at          0          avat
SFX A   at          me         avat
SFX A   at          te         avat
SFX A   t           je         avat
SFX A   t           jíc        avat
SFX A   t           jíce       avat
SFX A   at          i          [^aio]vat
SFX A   at          ìme        [^aio]vat
SFX A   at          ìte        [^aio]vat
SFX A   zat         ¾u         zat
SFX A   zat         ¾e¹        zat
SFX A   zat         ¾e         zat
SFX A   zat         ¾eme       zat
SFX A   zat         ¾ete       zat
SFX A   zat         ¾ou        zat
SFX A   zat         ¾          [^áíu]zat
SFX A   zat         ¾me        [^áíu]zat
SFX A   zat         ¾te        [^áíu]zat
SFX A   ázat        a¾         ázat
SFX A   ázat        a¾me       ázat
SFX A   ázat        a¾te       ázat
SFX A   ízat        i¾         ízat
SFX A   ízat        i¾me       ízat
SFX A   ízat        i¾te       ízat
SFX A   at          ej         uzat
SFX A   at          ejme       uzat
SFX A   at          ejte       uzat
SFX A   zat         ¾íc        [^áíu]zat
SFX A   zat         ¾íce       [^áíu]zat
SFX A   t           je         [yu]zat
SFX A   t           jíc        [yu]zat
SFX A   t           jíce       [yu]zat
SFX A   sat         ¹u         sat
SFX A   sat         ¹e¹        sat
SFX A   sat         ¹e         sat
SFX A   sat         ¹eme       sat
SFX A   sat         ¹ete       sat
SFX A   sat         ¹ou        sat
SFX A   sat         ¹          sat
SFX A   sat         ¹me        sat
SFX A   sat         ¹te        sat
SFX A   sat         ¹íc        sat
SFX A   sat         ¹íce       sat
SFX A   rat         eru        rat
SFX A   rat         ere¹       rat
SFX A   rat         ere        rat
SFX A   rat         ereme      rat
SFX A   rat         erete      rat
SFX A   rat         erou       rat
SFX A   rat         er         rat
SFX A   rat         erme       rat
SFX A   rat         erte       rat
SFX A   rat         era        rat
SFX A   rat         erouc      rat
SFX A   rat         erouce     rat
SFX A   akat        áèu        akat
SFX A   akat        áèe¹       akat
SFX A   akat        áèe        akat
SFX A   akat        áèeme      akat
SFX A   akat        áèete      akat
SFX A   akat        áèou       akat
SFX A   akat        aè         akat
SFX A   akat        aème       akat
SFX A   akat        aète       akat
SFX A   akat        aèíc       akat
SFX A   akat        aèíce      akat
SFX A   kat         èu         [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         èe¹        [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         èe         [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         èeme       [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         èete       [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         èou        [^a]kat
SFX A   at          ej         kat
SFX A   at          ejme       kat
SFX A   at          ejte       kat
SFX A   at          u          [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          e¹         [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          e          [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          eme        [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          ete        [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          ou         [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          0          [aeiyì][^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          me         [aeiyì][^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          te         [aeiyì][^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          0          [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A   at          me         [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A   at          te         [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A   t           je         [^rvz]at
SFX A   t           jíc        [^rvz]at
SFX A   t           jíce       [^rvz]at
SFX A   at          i          [csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ìme        [csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ìte        [csz][bmp]at
SFX A   t           ò          stat
SFX A   t           òme        stat
SFX A   t           òte        stat
SFX A   at          ej         [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ejme       [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ejte       [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ej         [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A   at          ejme       [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A   at          ejte       [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A   at          i          ¹lat
SFX A   t           l          [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           la         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           lo         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           li         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           ly         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   it          ím         it
SFX A   it          í¹         it
SFX A   it          í          it
SFX A   it          íme        it
SFX A   it          íte        it
SFX A   it          ì          [dtnbfpmv]it
SFX A   it          e          [^dtnbfpmv]it
SFX A   it          íc         it
SFX A   it          íce        it
SFX A   it          0          [^o]uèit
SFX A   it          me         [^o]uèit
SFX A   it          te         [^o]uèit
SFX A   oubit       ub         oubit
SFX A   oubit       ubme       oubit
SFX A   oubit       ubte       oubit
SFX A   ouèit       uè         ouèit
SFX A   ouèit       uème       ouèit
SFX A   ouèit       uète       ouèit
SFX A   dit         ï          [^o]udit
SFX A   dit         ïme        [^o]udit
SFX A   dit         ïte        [^o]udit
SFX A   oudit       uï         oudit
SFX A   oudit       uïme       oudit
SFX A   oudit       uïte       oudit
SFX A   t           0          [lr]oudit
SFX A   it          ìme        [lr]oudit
SFX A   it          ìte        [lr]oudit
SFX A   oulit       ul         oulit
SFX A   oulit       ulme       oulit
SFX A   oulit       ulte       oulit
SFX A   ounit       ouni       ounit
SFX A   ounit       ounìme     ounit
SFX A   ounit       ounìte     ounit
SFX A   oupit       up         oupit
SFX A   oupit       upme       oupit
SFX A   oupit       upte       oupit
SFX A   ouøit       uø         ouøit
SFX A   ouøit       uøme       ouøit
SFX A   ouøit       uøte       ouøit
SFX A   ousit       us         ousit
SFX A   ousit       usme       ousit
SFX A   ousit       uste       ousit
SFX A   outit       u»         outit
SFX A   outit       u»me       outit
SFX A   outit       u»te       outit
SFX A   ou¾it       u¾         ou¾it
SFX A   ou¾it       u¾me       ou¾it
SFX A   ou¾it       u¾te       ou¾it
SFX A   t           0          sou¾it
SFX A   it          eme        sou¾it
SFX A   it          ete        sou¾it
SFX A   ùlit        ul         ùlit
SFX A   ùlit        ulme       ùlit
SFX A   ùlit        ulte       ùlit
SFX A   ú¾it        u¾         ú¾it
SFX A   ú¾it        u¾me       ú¾it
SFX A   ú¾it        u¾te       ú¾it
SFX A   it          0          [aeioyì][bcèfjlmpøs¹vz¾]it
SFX A   it          me         [aeioyì][bcèfjlmpøs¹vz¾]it
SFX A   it          te         [aeioyì][bcèfjlmpøs¹vz¾]it
SFX A   t           0          [^aeiouyáéíóúùýìr][cèjløs¹z¾]it
SFX A   it          eme        [^aeiouyáéíóúùýìr][cèjløs¹z¾]it
SFX A   it          ete        [^aeiouyáéíóúùýìr][cèjløs¹z¾]it
SFX A   t           0          [^aeiouyáéíóúùýì][bfmpv]it
SFX A   it          ìme        [^aeiouyáéíóúùýì][bfmpv]it
SFX A   it          ìte        [^aeiouyáéíóúùýì][bfmpv]it
SFX A   it          0          r[bm]it
SFX A   it          me         r[bm]it
SFX A   it          te         r[bm]it
SFX A   it          0          [^o]u[bcèfjlmpøs¹vz¾]it
SFX A   it          me         [^o]u[bcèfjlmpøs¹vz¾]it
