lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
aktualizovat/ATN
aproximovat/ATN
bagrovat/ATN
bílit/ATN
bombírovat/ATN
břichatět/AJN
cibébovatět/AJN
cvrknout/ATN
členit/ATN
defraudovat/ATN
demokratizovat/ATN
deąifrovat/ATN
disociovat/ATN
dobásnit/ATN
docilovat/ATN
dodrat/ATN
dogenerovat/ATN
dohrnovat/ATN
dojit/ATN
dokončovat/ATN
dokručet/AN
dolepovat/ATN
domarnit/ATN
domystifikovat/ATN
doparfemovat/ATN
dopochodovat/ATN
dopulsovat/AN
dorvat/ATN
doskočit/AN
dostačit/AN
dosyčet/ATN
doąroubovat/ATN
dotlačit/ATN
doútočit/AN
dovozovat/ATN
dozorovat/ATN
driftovat/AN
dýmit/AN
excerpovat/ATN
favorizovat/ATN
formovat/ATN
giloąovat/ATN
hanobit/ATN
hloubit/ATN
hospitovat/AN
hřmotit/AN
chcípnout/AN
chřupat/AJTN
indikovat/ATN
interagovat/AN
jankovatět/AN
kamenovat/ATN
kecnout/AN
klofnout/ATN
kolacionovat/ATN
končit/ATN
konvergovat/ATN
koątovat/ATN
kriminalizovat/ATN
kříľkovat/ATN
kvapit/ATN
lanařit/AN
liberalisovat/ATN
lopotit/AN
manévrovat/ATN
meliorovat/ATN
mlknout/AN
mrątit/ATN
nabájit/ATN
nacyklostylovat/ATN
nadhazovat/ATN
nadřít/ATN
nahlédnout/ATXN
nainstalovat/ATN
nakombinovat/ATN
nakřesat/AJTN
nalétnout/AN
namést/ATN
naostřovat/ATN
naplňovat/ATN
napřímit/ATN
nařknout/ACTN
nasmradit/ATN
nastudit/ACN
naąpendlit/ATN
natrápit/ATN
navigovat/ATN
naznačovat/ATN
nopovat/ATN
oběsit/ACN
obklusat/AJN
oblizovat/ATN
obrodit/ACN
obtéct/ATN
očárkovat/ATN
odbouchnout/ATN
oddechovat/ATN
odfotografovat/ATN
odhrnout/ATN
odklidit/ACN
odkrokovat/ATN
odleľet/ATN
odměřit/ATN
odoperovat/ATN
odplevelit/ATN
odprosit/ATN
odřadit/ACTN
odsouhlasit/ATN
odsupět/ATN
odtajit/ATN
oduąevnit/ATN
odvodit/ACN
ofotit/ACN
ohryzat/AJTN
oklamat/ATN
okřikovat/ATN
omazat/ATN
opalisovat/ATN
oplést/ATN
opravovat/ATN
orvat/ATN
oslyąet/ATN
osvěľit/ATN
otelit/ATN
ověřit/ATN
oznamovat/ATN
paličkovat/ATN
pasírovat/ATN
perforovat/ATN
planout/AN
poangličtit/ATN
počít/ATN
podhustit/ACN
podmést/ATN
podřaďovat/ATN
podtrhnout/ACN
pohltit/ACN
pochodit/AN
pokonversovat/AN
pokusit/AN
politovat/ATN
pomrznout/ATN
popadnout/AN
poprat/AN
porvat/AN
posouľit/ATN
posukovat/ATN
potázat/AN
poutrácet/AJTN
povyskočit/AN
pozruąovat/ATN
prefixovat/ATN
procedit/ACN
producírovat/AN
prohníst/AN
prokalkulovat/ATN
prokrajovat/ATN
prolomit/ATN
promodulovat/ATN
proplést/ATN
prořvat/AN
prostehovat/ATN
proąkrtnout/ATN
protlačovat/ATN
provířit/ATN
prýątit/ATN
přečárnout/AN
předformovat/ATN
přednastavit/ATN
předskočit/AN
předvaľovat/ATN
přehlédnout/ATXN
přeinstrumentovat/ATN
překořenit/ATN
překvasit/ACN
přelobovat/ATN
přemyslit/ACN
přeplatit/ACN
přeráľet/AJTN
přeskákat/ATN
přestřihovat/ATN
přeąpendlovat/ATN
přetrénovat/ATN
převézt/ATN
přeľrat/ATN
přidělovat/ATN
přikápnout/ATN
přikrmovat/ATN
přimaą»ovat/ATN
připaľovat/ATN
připravit/ATN
přislibovat/ATN
přisvědčit/ATN
přitlačit/ATN
přivinovat/ATN
půdovat/ATN
raftovat/AN
refinancovat/ATN
relativizovat/ATN
restovat/ATN
rojit/ATN
rozbřednout/AN
rozďobat/AJTN
rozestavit/ATN
rozhořčovat/ATN
rozklínovat/ATN
rozkřičet/ATN
rozlučovat/ATN
rozmoknout/ATN
rozpéct/ATN
rozprchnout/ATN
rozřeďovat/ATN
rozsvítit/ACN
roztančit/ATN
rozuzlit/ATN
rozvlnit/ATN
ruinovat/ATN
řídnout/AN
sbrousit/ACN
segregovat/ATN
sesíct/AN
seąikovat/ATN
schematizovat/ATN
skloubit/ATN
slíznout/ATN
smět/AJN
sniľovat/ATN
spočinout/AN
srocovat/AN
strávit/ATN
svařovat/ATN
ąatit/ACN
ąpiclovat/ATN
téct/AN
transferovat/ATN
túrovat/ATN
udobřit/ATN
uklepat/AJTN
umastit/ACN
uplánovat/ATN
usednout/AN
ustřelovat/ATN
utopit/ATN
uzdravit/ATN
vemluvit/ATN
vkopnout/ATN
vozit/ACN
vsunout/ATN
vybouřit/ATN
vyděrovat/ATN
vyhecovat/ATN
vychytračit/ATN
vykouzlit/ATN
vylízat/AJTN
vymřít/AN
vypláznout/ATN
vypůjčovat/ATN
vysklít/ATN
vystruľovat/ATN
vyąpulit/ATN
vytřídit/ATN
vyvýąit/ATN
vzlyknout/AN
zablýsknout/AN
začíst/ATN
zaházet/AJTN
zachraňovat/ATN
zakňučet/AN
zakupovat/ATN
zaměňovat/ATN
zaostřovat/ATN
zapraľit/ATN
zaříznout/ATN
zastraąit/ATN
zaąroubovat/ATN
zatřpytit/AN
zavodňovat/ATN
zbídačovat/ATN
zdělit/ATN
zefektivnit/ATN
zglajchąaltovat/ATN
zchvátit/ACN
zklihovatět/ATN
zkrotnout/AN
zmalátnět/AJN
zmutovat/ATN
znepříjemnit/ATN
zobrazit/ATN
zpodobit/ATN
zprznit/ATN
zreľírovat/ATN
ztropit/ATN
zverąovat/ATN
ľivit/ATN
